Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202682-108.03
Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society, in accordance with appropriate museum and archival standards, exclusively for the acquisition, preservation, or restoration of the society collections, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the Historical Society Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund may consist of money from the sale or other disposition of property owned by the society. Such money shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 210.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.